Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 16d. new text end new text begin Enhanced penalty. new text end new text begin "Enhanced penalty" means a mandatory late fee or civil penalty imposed by the board that applies after a $25,000 threshold is exceeded or is determined using a multiplier or percentage under sections 10A.025, subdivision 2, 3, 4, or 5; 10A.12, subdivision 1b; 10A.14, subdivision 4; 10A.20, subdivision 12; 10A.244, subdivision 4; 10A.27, subdivision 13; and 10A.29. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 26c. new text end new text begin Total contributions. new text end new text begin "Total contributions" means the total of all contributions. Contributions include all contributions received, in-kind contributions received, loans, and any other types of contributions. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 26d. new text end new text begin Total disbursements. new text end new text begin "Total disbursements" means the total of all disbursements. Disbursements include expenditures, in-kind expenditures, approved expenditures, contributions made, in-kind contributions made, independent expenditures, noncampaign disbursements, electioneering communications, and any other types of expenditures and disbursements. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.02, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Fees and penalties. (a) Upon written request, certified pursuant to section 10A.025, subdivision 2, the board must waive that portion of a late filing fee or a civil penalty imposed for the late filing of a report or statement under this chapter for which the requester demonstrates good cause for the late filing or submission. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the board must not waive any portion of an enhanced penalty. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c) new text end The board must deposit all fees and civil penalties collected under this chapter into the general deleted text begin fund in the state treasurydeleted text end new text begin account of the state elections campaign account in the special revenue fundnew text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.025, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Penalty for false statements. (a) A report or statement required to be filed under this chapter must be signed and certified as true by the individual required to file the report. The signature may be an electronic signature consisting of a password assigned by the board. (b) An individual deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not sign and certify to be true a report or statement knowing it contains false information or knowing it omits required information. (c) An individual deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not knowingly provide false or incomplete information to a treasurer with the intent that the treasurer will rely on that information in signing and certifying to be true a report or statement. (d) A person who violates paragraph (b) or (c) is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of deleted text begin up to $3,000deleted text end new text begin an amount equal to four times the amount of the total contributions and total disbursements that were knowingly false or omitted from the reportnew text end . A violation of paragraph (b) or (c) is a gross misdemeanor. (e) The board deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end impose deleted text begin an additional civil penalty of up to $3,000deleted text end on the principal campaign committee or candidate, party unit, political committee, or association that has a political fund that is affiliated with an individual who violated paragraph (b) or (c)new text begin an additional civil penalty of an amount equal to four times the amount of the total contributions and total disbursements that were knowingly omitted from the reportnew text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.025, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Record keeping; penalty. (a) A person required to file a report or statement or who has accepted record-keeping responsibility for the filer must maintain records on the matters required to be reported, including vouchers, canceled checks, bills, invoices, worksheets, and receipts, that will provide in sufficient detail the necessary information from which the filed reports and statements may be verified, explained, clarified, and checked for accuracy and completeness. The person must keep the records available for audit, inspection, or examination by the board or its authorized representatives for four years from the date of filing of the reports or statements or of changes or corrections to them. (b) The board deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end impose a civil penalty deleted text begin of up to $3,000deleted text end on a person who knowingly violates this subdivisionnew text begin of an amount equal to four times the amount reflected on the missing recordsnew text end . new text begin (c)new text end The board may impose deleted text begin a separate civil penalty of up to $3,000deleted text end on the principal campaign committee or candidate, party unit, political committee, or association that has a political fund that is affiliated with an individual who violated this subdivisionnew text begin a separate civil penalty of an amount equal to four times the amount reflected on the missing recordsnew text end . deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A knowing violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.025, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Changes and corrections. new text begin (a) new text end Material changes in information previously submitted and corrections to a report or statement must be reported in writing to the board within ten days following the date of the event prompting the change or the date upon which the person filing became aware of the inaccuracy. The change or correction must identify the form and the paragraph containing the information to be changed or corrected. A request from the board to a lobbyist to provide more detailed information about a specific subject of interest disclosed on a lobbyist disbursement report is a change or correction governed by this subdivision. new text begin (b) new text end A person who willfully fails to report a material change or correction is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of deleted text begin up to $3,000deleted text end new text begin four times the amount of the required change or correction in the reportnew text end . A willful violation of this subdivision is a gross misdemeanor. new text begin (c) new text end The board must send a written notice to any individual who fails to file a report required by this subdivision. If the individual fails to file the required report within ten business days after the notice was sent, the board may impose a late filing fee of $25 per day up to $1,000 starting on the 11th day after the notice was sent. new text begin (d)new text end The board may send an additional notice by certified mail to an individual who fails to file a report within ten business days after the first notice was sent by the board. The certified notice must state that if the individual does not file the requested report within ten business days after the certified notice was sent, the individual may be subject to a civil penalty for failure to file a report. an individual who fails to file a report required by this subdivision within ten business days after the certified notice was sent by the board is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of up to $1,000. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.025, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Reconciliation information; penalty. new text begin (a) new text end An individual or association required to file a report under this chapter must provide information requested by the board to reconcile discrepancies between the report and reports filed by other individuals or associations. The board's request for information must be in writing. If the individual or association fails to provide the requested information within ten business days after the request was sent, the board may impose a late filing fee of $25 per day up to $1,000. new text begin (b) new text end The board may send notice by certified mail to an individual or association that has not timely responded to the board's written request for reconciliation information. The certified notice must state that if the individual or association does not respond to the board's request for information within ten business days after the certified notice was sent, the individual or association may be subject to a civil penalty for failure to provide information to the board. an individual or association that does not provide the requested information within ten business days after the certified notice was sent is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of up to $1,000. new text begin (c) new text end A person who willfully fails to cooperate with the board to reconcile a report discrepancy is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of deleted text begin up to $3,000deleted text end new text begin an amount equal to four times the discrepancynew text end . Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.12, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Penalty for noncompliant independent expenditure. An association that makes an independent expenditure without complying with subdivision 1a is subject to a civil penalty of up to four times the amount of the independent expenditure, deleted text begin but not to exceed $25,000,deleted text end except when the violation was intentional.new text begin When the violation is intentional, the board must impose a civil penalty of ten times the amount of the independent expenditure. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.14, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Failure to file; penalty. new text begin (a)new text end If an individual fails to file a statement required by this section by the date that the statement was due, the board may impose a late filing fee of $25 per day, not to exceed $1,000, starting on the day after the statement was due.new text begin If a report filed with the board reflects total contributions or total expenditures of more than $25,000 that were not timely disclosed due to a late registration statement, the board must instead impose a late filing fee of ten percent of that total, per day, starting on the day after the report was due.new text end new text begin (b) new text end The board must send notice by certified mail to any individual who fails to file a statement within ten business days after the statement was due that the individual may be subject to a civil penalty for failure to file the statement. an individual who fails to file the statement within seven days after the certified mail notice was sent by the board is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of up to $1,000.new text begin If a statement required by subdivision 1 is not filed within seven days after the certified mail notice was sent by the board and a report filed with the board shows that the committee, fund, or party unit has total contributions or total disbursements in excess of $25,000 that were not timely disclosed due to the late registration statement, the board must impose a civil penalty of an amount equal to four times the amount of total contributions or total disbursements that were not timely disclosed, whichever is greater.new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.20, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Failure to file; late fees; penalty. (a) If an individual or association fails to file a report required by this section or section 10A.202, the board may impose a late filing fee and a civil penalty as provided in this subdivision. (b) If a candidate, political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, or party unit fails to file a report required by this section that is due January 31, the board may impose a late filing fee of $25 per day, not to exceed $1,000, commencing the day after the report was due. (c) Except for reports governed by paragraph (b), if an individual, political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, party unit, or association fails to file a report required by subdivision 2, 2a, deleted text begin ordeleted text end 5, new text begin or 5a, new text end or by section 10A.202, the board may impose a late filing fee of $50 per day, not to exceed $1,000, commencing on the day after the date the deleted text begin statementdeleted text end new text begin reportnew text end was due. If the total deleted text begin expendituresdeleted text end new text begin contributionsnew text end or new text begin total new text end disbursements new text begin exceed $250,000 or the total contributions or total disbursements new text end that deleted text begin occurred during the reporting period exceedsdeleted text end new text begin were required to be disclosed for the first time exceednew text end $25,000, then the board deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end also impose a late filing fee of deleted text begin up to twodeleted text end new text begin tennew text end percent of the deleted text begin expenditures or disbursementsdeleted text end new text begin total contributions or total disbursements, whichever is greater,new text end that should have been reported, per day, commencing on the day after the report was due, not to exceed 100 percent of the amount that should have been reported. (d) If an individual, political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, party unit, or association has been assessed a late filing fee or civil penalty under this subdivision during the prior four years, the board may impose a late filing fee, a civil penalty, or both of up to twice the amount otherwise authorized by this subdivision. If an individual, political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, party unit, or association has been assessed a late filing fee new text begin or civil penalty new text end under this subdivision more than two times during the prior four years, the board may impose a late filing fee new text begin or civil penalty, or both, new text end of up to three times the amount otherwise authorized by this subdivision. new text begin (e) If an individual, political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, party unit, or association has been assessed an enhanced penalty during the prior four years, the board must impose a late filing fee, a civil penalty, or both, of up to twice the amount otherwise authorized by this subdivision. If an individual, political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, party unit, or association has been assessed an enhanced penalty more than two times during the prior four years, the board must impose a late filing fee, a civil penalty, or both, of up to three times the amount otherwise authorized by this subdivision. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end Within ten business days after the report was due or receipt by the board of information disclosing the potential failure to file a report required by this section, the board must send notice by certified mail that the individual or association may be subject to a civil penalty for failure to file the report. An individual who fails to file the report within seven days after the certified mail notice was sent by the board is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of up to $2,000 in addition to the late filing fees imposed by this subdivision.new text begin If the total contributions or total disbursements exceed $250,000 or the total contributions or total disbursements that were required to be disclosed for the first time within the report exceed $25,000, the board must impose a civil penalty of an amount equal to four times the amount of the total contributions or total disbursements that should have been reported, whichever is greater.new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.244, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Penalty for financial activity while in voluntary inactive status. If an association fails to notify the board of its political fund's resumption of active status under subdivision 3, the board may impose a civil penalty of $50 per day, not to exceed $1,000 commencing on the 15th calendar day after the fund resumed active status.new text begin If the total contributions or total disbursements are greater than $25,000 while in voluntary inactive status and prior to filing the notice required by subdivision 3, the board must: new text end new text begin (1) impose a late fee of ten percent of the larger of the total contributions or the total disbursements per day starting on the day after the notification was due; and new text end new text begin (2) impose a civil penalty of an amount that is equal to four times the amount of unreported total contributions or unreported total disbursements, whichever is greater. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.27, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Unregistered association limit; statement; penalty. (a) The treasurer of a political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, or party unit must not accept a contribution of more than $200 from an association not registered under this chapter unless the contribution is accompanied by a statement that meets the disclosure and reporting period requirements imposed by section 10A.20. The statement may be a written statement or a government website where the disclosure report for the unregistered association may be viewed. This statement must be certified as true and correct by an officer of the contributing association. The committee, fund, or party unit that accepts the contribution must include a copy of the written statement or website with the report that discloses the contribution to the board. (b) An unregistered association may provide the statement required by this subdivision to no more than three committees, funds, or party units in deleted text begin a calendar yeardeleted text end new text begin an election segmentnew text end . Each statement must cover at least the 30 days immediately preceding and including the date on which the contribution was made. An unregistered association or an officer of it is subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of up to $1,000, if the association or its officer: (1) fails to provide a statement as required by this subdivision; or (2) fails to register after giving the statement required by this subdivision to more than three committees, funds, or party units in deleted text begin a calendar yeardeleted text end new text begin an election segmentnew text end . new text begin If an association violates clause (2) and the total contributions during the election segment exceed $25,000, the board must impose on the association a civil penalty of an amount equal to four times the amount contributed to all committees, funds, or party units in the election segment. new text end (c) The treasurer of a political committee, political fund, principal campaign committee, or party unit who accepts a contribution in excess of $200 from an unregistered association without the required disclosure statement is subject to a civil penalty up to four times the amount in excess of $200. (d) This subdivision does not apply: (1) when a national political party contributes money to its state committee; (2) when a federal committee of a major or minor political party registered with the board gives an in-kind contribution to the federal committee's state central committee or a party organization within a house of the state legislature; or (3) to purchases by candidates for federal office of tickets to events or space rental at events held by party units in this state (i) if the geographical area represented by the party unit includes any part of the geographical area of the office that the federal candidate is seeking and (ii) the purchase price is not more than that paid by other attendees or renters of similar spaces. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10A.29, is amended to read: 10A.29 CIRCUMVENTION PROHIBITED. An individual or association that attempts to circumvent this chapter by redirecting a contribution through, or making a contribution on behalf of, another individual or association is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and subject to a civil penalty imposed by the board of deleted text begin up to $3,000deleted text end new text begin an amount equal to four times the contributionnew text end . Sec. 15. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective January 1, 2027. new text end